Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-200 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Age-


Appropriate Materials Act”.

Req. No. 2560 Page 1


B. The Legislature finds that:


1. Public schools exist to provide a safe learning environment


for children;


2. No child should be exposed to sexually explicit, profane, or


indecent content;


3. Public school administrators, educators, and employees


entrusted with the care of children must be held accountable for


knowingly allowing sexually explicit, profane, or indecent content


to be housed, distributed, or made accessible to students; and


4. The provisions of this act are necessary to protect the


health, safety, and morals of students in this state.


C. As used in this section:


1. “Harmful to minors” has the same meaning as provided in


Section 1040.75 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “Library” means a school library or media program, a


classroom library, or any other collection of books or other print


or digital materials that are maintained by a school district or its


employees for use by students and that do not qualify as textbooks


under the authority of the State Textbook Committee;


3. “Nudity” has the same meaning as provided in Section 1040.75


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. “Obscene” has the same meaning as provided in Section 1024.1


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 2560 Page 2


5. “Sexual conduct” means sexual contact, actual or simulated


sexual intercourse, deviate sexual intercourse, rape, sexual


bestiality, masturbation, sado-masochistic abuse, incest,


molestation, necrophilia, or lewd exhibition of the genitals, anus,


or any portion of the female breast below the top of the areola; and


6. “Sexually explicit content” means any communication,


language, or material including a written description, illustration,


photographic image, video image, or audio file that describes,


depicts, or portrays sexual conduct, actual or simulated sexual


intercourse, deviate sexual intercourse, rape, sexual bestiality,


masturbation, sado-masochistic abuse, incest, molestation,


necrophilia, or lewd exhibition of the genitals, anus, or any


portion of the female breast below the top of the areola.


D. No public school district or public charter school in this


state shall purchase, house, approve, distribute, or make available


to students any print or nonprint materials or multimedia resources


containing or depicting obscene material, sexual conduct, sexually


explicit content, nudity, or material that is harmful to minors.


E. The board of education of each public school district and


the governing body of each public charter school shall adopt


policies to ensure compliance with the provisions of this act


including, but not limited to, policies that:


1. Provide for the identification and removal of any print or


nonprint materials or multimedia resources currently housed,

Req. No. 2560 Page 3


displayed, or accessible to students that contain or depict obscene


material, sexual conduct, sexually explicit content, nudity, or


material that is harmful to minors no later than March 1, 2027;


2. Establish procedures to review existing print and nonprint


library materials, multimedia resources, and classroom library


materials prior to acquisition of new materials to prevent the


inclusion of material containing or depicting obscene material,


sexual conduct, sexually explicit content, nudity, or material that


is harmful to minors; and


3. Provide for the maintenance of documentation showing


compliance with the provisions of this act, which shall be made


available to the State Department of Education upon request.


F. By August 15 each year, each public school district and


public charter school in this state shall audit print and nonprint


materials and multimedia resources located in a school library,


classroom library, or elsewhere on the premises of the school


district or charter school and remove any material or resource


containing or depicting obscene material, sexual conduct, sexually


explicit content, nudity, or material that is harmful to minors.


Beginning September 8, 2027, each school district and charter school


shall maintain and make available for public inspection an inventory


of all print and nonprint materials and multimedia resources located


in a school library, classroom library, or elsewhere on the premises


of the school district or charter school.

Req. No. 2560 Page 4


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-200.1 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Board of Education, in collaboration with the


Oklahoma Department of Libraries, shall develop and adopt standards


for public school district and public charter school library media


programs. The standards shall govern the acquisition, cataloging,


display, and availability of print and nonprint materials and


multimedia resources and shall include:


1. A requirement that a school district or charter school


library media specialist or librarian review the standards upon


hiring; and


2. A library collection policy that:


a. prohibits the possession, acquisition, display, or


purchase of print and nonprint materials and


multimedia resources that:


(1) contain or depict obscene material, sexual


conduct, sexually explicit content, nudity, or


material that is harmful to minors, and


(2) refers a person, by printed or digital means, to


a website containing or depicting obscene


material, sexual conduct, nudity, or material


that is harmful to minors,



Req. No. 2560 Page 5


b. recognizes that obscene material is not protected


under the First Amendment to the United States


Constitution,


c. applies to all library materials available for use or


display including, but not limited to, print and


nonprint materials and multimedia resources contained


in school libraries, classroom libraries, classroom


reading collections, electronic catalogs, mobile


library applications, and any other platform


accessible to students,


d. requires school districts and charter schools to


provide an online library catalog that is accessible


to the general public, and


e. except as provided for in subsection C of this


section, prohibits the removal of a print or nonprint


material or multimedia resource based solely on:


(1) the viewpoint or ideas contained in the material


or resource, or


(2) the personal background or characteristics of the


author or characters within the material or


resource.


B. The board of education of a public school district or the


governing body of a public charter school may adopt policies that



Req. No. 2560 Page 6


are more restrictive than the standards adopted pursuant to


subsection A of this section.


C. 1. The parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled in a


public school district or public charter school, a resident of a


public school district or a public school district served by a


public charter school, or a taxpayer in this state may submit a


formal challenge regarding suspected violations of the standards


adopted pursuant to subsection A of this section.


2. A formal challenge shall be submitted to the principal of


the school site in which the challenged material or resource is


located. Upon receipt of a formal challenge, the principal shall


immediately remove the material or resource from school premises.


The principal shall notify the superintendent of the school district


or charter school of the challenge and removal within three (3)


business days.


3. The superintendent of the school district or charter school


shall:


a. permanently remove the material or resource if it is


deemed to contain or depict obscene material, sexual


conduct, sexually explicit content, nudity, or


material that is harmful to minors. The


superintendent shall notify the board of education of


the school district or the governing body of the



Req. No. 2560 Page 7


charter school within one (1) business day of


permanently removing the material or resource, or


b. deny the formal challenge and notify the board of


education of the school district or the governing body


of the charter school within one (1) business day of


such denial.


4. If the superintendent of the school district or charter


school denies the formal challenge, the board of education of the


school district or the governing body of the charter school shall


hold a public meeting within thirty (30) business days of issuance


of the denial to determine whether to uphold or overturn the denial.


Notice of the public meeting shall be posted five (5) days in


advance of the meeting. The meeting shall allow a minimum of forty-


five (45) minutes for public comment.


5. If the board of education of a school district or the


governing body of a charter school upholds a denial of a formal


challenge pursuant to paragraph 4 of this subsection, a person


aggrieved by such decision may bring a civil action against the


school district or charter school to recover such relief as may be


appropriate.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2560 EB 1/9/2026 1:21:07 PM



Req. No. 2560 Page 8